Maryland, session 2025, HB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
16–302.
(a) To qualify for a real estate appraisal license, an applicant shall be an
individual who meets the requirements of this section.
(b) An applicant shall be of good character and reputation.
(c) An applicant shall be at least 18 years old.
(d) (1) An applicant shall satisfy the minimum real estate appraiser
qualifications for licensure established under the federal Financial Institutions Reform,
Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.
(2) An applicant shall have completed:
(i) at least 1,000 hours providing real estate appraiser services as a
real estate appraiser trainee under the supervision of a certified appraiser; or
(ii) the Real Property Appraiser Qualification Criteria of the
Practical Applications of Real Estate Appraisal program adopted by the Appraisal
Foundation Appraiser Qualifications Board authorized under the federal Financial
Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.
– 1 –

Ch. 341 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Classroom hours of study required by this section may be conducted by:
(i) an accredited university, college, or community or junior college;
(ii) an approved appraisal society, institute, or association; or
(iii) another school that the Commission approves.
(4) The Commission shall approve all courses of study required under this
section.
(5) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT REQUIRE AN APPLICANT TO HOLD A
BACHELOR’S DEGREE OR HIGHER TO QUALIFY FOR LICENSURE UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, the applicant shall pass an
examination given by the Commission or the Commission’s designee under this subtitle.
(f) (1) If an applicant is not a resident of the State, the applicant shall submit
to the Commission an irrevocable consent, as provided under this subsection.
(2) The consent required under this section shall specify that service of
process on the Secretary shall bind the applicant in any action about the provision of real
estate appraisal services brought against the applicant in any county of the State.
(g) The Commission shall adopt additional requirements under this section if
necessary to comply with the minimum real estate appraiser qualifications established
under the federal Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.
(h) The Commission may monitor and review any course of study approved under
this section.
16–503.
(a) To qualify for a certificate for residential or general real estate appraisal, an
applicant shall be an individual who meets the requirements of this section.
(b) (1) An applicant shall:
(i) be of good character and reputation;
(ii) be at least 18 years old; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 341
(iii) satisfy the minimum real estate appraiser qualifications for
residential certification or general certification, as appropriate, established under the
federal Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.
(2) An applicant shall have completed:
(i) at least 1,500 hours providing real estate appraiser services as a
real estate appraiser trainee under the supervision of a certified appraiser; or
(ii) the Real Property Appraiser Qualification Criteria of the
Practical Applications of Real Estate Appraisal program adopted by the Appraisal
Foundation Appraiser Qualifications Board authorized under the federal Financial
Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.
(3) Classroom hours of study required under this section may be conducted
by:
(i) an accredited university, college, or community or junior college;
(ii) an approved appraisal society, institute, or association; or
(iii) another school that the Commission approves.
(4) The Commission shall approve all courses of study required under this
section.
(5) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT REQUIRE AN APPLICANT TO HOLD A
BACHELOR’S DEGREE OR HIGHER TO QUALIFY FOR RESIDENTIAL CERTIFICATION
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(c) An applicant shall pass the examination for a certificate for residential or
general real estate appraisal given by the Commission or the Commission’s designee under
this subtitle.
(d) (1) If an applicant is not a resident of the State, the applicant shall submit
to the Commission an irrevocable consent, as provided under this subsection.
(2) The consent required under this subsection shall specify that service of
process on the Secretary of State shall bind the applicant in any action about the provision
of certified real estate appraisal services against the applicant in any county of the State.
(e) An applicant shall meet any other requirement that the Commission adopts
by regulation.
– 3 –

Ch. 341 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) The Commission shall adopt additional requirements under this section if
necessary to comply with the minimum real estate appraiser qualifications established
under the federal Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –